Hawaii statutes.
§341-3 Office of environmental quality
control; environmental center; environmental council. (a) There is
created an office of environmental quality control that shall be headed by a
single executive to be known as the director of environmental quality control
who shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34. This
office shall implement this chapter and shall be placed within the department
of health for administrative purposes. The office shall perform its duties
under chapter 343 and shall serve the governor in an advisory capacity on all
matters relating to environmental quality control.

(b) The environmental center within the
University of Hawaii shall be as established under section [304A-1551].

(c) There is created an environmental council
not to exceed fifteen members. Except for the director, members of the
environmental council shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section
26-34. The council shall be attached to the department of health for
administrative purposes. Except for the director, the term of each member
shall be four years; provided that, of the members initially appointed, five
members shall serve for four years, five members shall serve for three years,
and the remaining four members shall serve for two years. Vacancies shall be
filled for the remainder of any unexpired term in the same manner as original
appointments. The director shall be an ex officio voting member of the
council. The council chairperson shall be elected by the council from among
the appointed members of the council.

Members shall be appointed to assure a broad
and balanced representation of educational, business, and environmentally
pertinent disciplines and professions, such as the natural and social sciences,
the humanities, architecture, engineering, environmental consulting, public
health, and planning; educational and research institutions with environmental
competence; agriculture, real estate, visitor industry, construction, media,
and voluntary community and environmental groups. The members of the council
shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of their duties. [L 1970,
c 132, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; am L 1983, c 140, §1; am L 1987, c
233, §1; am L 2006, c 75, §13]

Law Journals and Reviews

Determining the Expiration Date of an Environmental Impact
Statement: When to Supplement a Stale EIS in Hawai‘i. 35 UH L. Rev. 249
(2013).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next